Massachusetts, session 194th, H2036.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 272 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 108. (a) As used in this section the following terms shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Person”, shall not include the manufacturer of the motor vehicle, provider of telematics
equipment and services or entities that rent motor vehicles.
“Starter interrupt technology”, technology used to remotely disable the starter of a motor
vehicle.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), a person who knowingly installs, conceals or
otherwise places or uses an electronic tracking device in or on a motor vehicle without the
of 3

consent of the operator and all occupants of the vehicle for the purpose of monitoring or
following the operator, occupant or occupants of the vehicle shall be punished by imprisonment
in a house of correction for not more than 1 year, or by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by
both.
(c)(1) It shall not be a violation if the installation, concealment, placement or use of an
electronic tracking device in or on a motor vehicle is by, or at the direction of, a law enforcement
officer in furtherance of a criminal investigation and is carried out in accordance with the
applicable state and federal law.
(2) If the installation, concealment, placement or use of an electronic tracking device in
or on a motor vehicle is by, or at the direction of, a parent or legal guardian who owns or leases
the vehicle, and if the device is used solely for the purpose of monitoring the minor child of the
parent or legal guardian when the child is an occupant of the vehicle, then the installation,
concealment, placement or use of the device in or on the vehicle without the consent of any or all
occupants in the vehicle shall not be a violation, unless the person utilizing the tracking device
has an active restraining order or no contact order against them for the protection of any vehicle
occupant.
(3) It shall not be a violation of this section if an electronic tracking device is attached to
stolen goods for the purpose of tracking the location of the stolen goods, whether or not they may
be transported in a vehicle, or if installed, concealed, placed or used in or on a vehicle as a
vehicle theft recovery device.
(4) It shall not be a violation of this section if an electronic tracking device, including but
not limited to devices also containing technology used to remotely disable the starter of a motor
of 3

vehicle, is installed or used by a licensed motor vehicle dealer in connection with the credit sale,
loan or lease of a motor vehicle with the express written consent of the vehicle’s purchaser,
lessor or lessee.
(5) It shall not be a violation of this section if an electronic tracking device is installed or
used by a business that is authorized to transact business in this state and the tracking device is
used by the business for the purpose of tracking vehicles that are owned or leased by the business
and driven by employees of that business, its affiliates or contractors of that business or its
affiliates.
(d) This section shall not apply to a tracking system installed by the manufacturer of a
motor vehicle, a provider of telematics equipment and services, or installed or used by an entity
renting out vehicles, or installed or provided by an insurance company with the vehicle owner’s
or vehicle lessee’s permission to monitor driving habits for insurance rating purposes.
of 3